Utah statutes.
63J-4a-303.   Cooperation and support.

The department, the division, each consultant or contractor of the department or division, and each provider shall provide its full cooperation and support to the inspector general and the office in fulfilling the duties of the inspector general and the office.



Enacted by Chapter 151, 2011 General Session

